Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1111.01
Licensed dental assistant, defined.

Licensed dental assistant means a dental assistant who holds a license to practice as a dental assistant under the Dentistry Practice Act.

Laws 2017, LB18, § 5.